Maryland, session 2025, HB0182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(8) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
(b) (1) (i) A speed monitoring system may not be used in a local jurisdiction
under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction
by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
(vi) This section applies to a violation of this subtitle recorded by a
speed monitoring system that meets the requirements of this subsection and has been
placed:
– 1 –

Ch. 505 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. In Anne Arundel County, Montgomery County, or Prince
George’s County, on a highway in a residential district, as defined in § 21–101 of this title,
with a maximum posted speed limit of 35 miles per hour, which speed limit was established
using generally accepted traffic engineering practices;
2. In a school zone with a posted speed limit of at least 20
miles per hour;
3. In Prince George’s County:
A. Subject to subparagraph (vii)1 of this paragraph, on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway); or
B. On that part of a highway located within the grounds of
an institution of higher education as defined in § 10–101(h) of the Education Article, or
within one–half mile of the grounds of a building or property used by the institution of
higher education where generally accepted traffic and engineering practices indicate that
motor vehicle, pedestrian, or bicycle traffic is substantially generated or influenced by the
institution of higher education;
4. Subject to subparagraph (vii)2 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City;
5. In Anne Arundel County, on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup
Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line; or
6. Subject to subparagraph (vii)3 of this paragraph, at the
intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County.
(c) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (f)(4) of this
section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor vehicle is
recorded by a speed monitoring system while being operated in violation of this subtitle.
(2) A civil penalty under this subsection [may not exceed $40] IS:
(I) IF THE CITATION ALLEGES THAT THE DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCEEDED THE SPEED LIMIT BY BETWEEN 12 AND 15, INCLUSIVE,
MILES PER HOUR, $40 $50 $40;
(II) IF THE CITATION ALLEGES THAT THE DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCEEDED THE SPEED LIMIT BY BETWEEN 16 AND 19, INCLUSIVE,
MILES PER HOUR, $55 $70;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 505
(III) IF THE CITATION ALLEGES THAT THE DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCEEDED THE SPEED LIMIT BY BETWEEN 20 AND 29, INCLUSIVE,
MILES PER HOUR, $95 $120;
(IV) IF THE CITATION ALLEGES THAT THE DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCEEDED THE SPEED LIMIT BY BETWEEN 30 AND 39, INCLUSIVE,
MILES PER HOUR, $180 $230; AND
(V) IF THE CITATION ALLEGES THAT THE DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCEEDED THE SPEED LIMIT BY 40 MILES PER HOUR OR MORE,
$350 $425.
(3) For purposes of this section, the District Court shall prescribe[:
(i) A] A uniform citation form consistent with subsection (d)(1) of
this section and § 7–302 of the Courts Article[; and
(ii) A civil penalty, which shall be indicated on the citation, to be paid
by persons who choose to prepay the civil penalty without appearing in District Court].
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The State Highway Administration shall convene a workgroup to study best
practices regarding speed monitoring systems in school zones.
(b) The study of the workgroup shall:
(1) include relevant local education stakeholders, including local
governments, local law enforcement, and any other participants necessary to fully
represent the interests of student pedestrians in school zones;
(2) assess:
(i) the existing policies regarding speed monitoring systems in
school zones;
(ii) whether the current radius in which speed monitoring systems
are allowed in school zones is consistent with best practices;
(iii) the annual number of serious traffic incidents that occur within
the current radius in which speed monitoring systems are allowed in school zones, by
jurisdiction;
– 3 –

Ch. 505 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iv) the number of speed monitoring systems currently located within
the current radius in which speed monitoring systems are allowed in school zones, by
jurisdiction;
(v) the average distance that each speed monitoring system within
a school zone is located from the property line of the school with which it is associated, by
county; and
(vi) any other best practices regarding the use of speed monitoring
systems in school zones.
(c) On or before December 1, 2025, the State Highway Administration shall
submit the findings and any recommendations of the study to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 4 –